local/apertium-tr-az/apertium-tr-az.az.dix.xml
      <pardef n="bəslə/mək__vblex">
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>rəm</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>rəmmi</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="int"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mərəm</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mərəmmi</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="int"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>rsən</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>rsənmi</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="int"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>məzsən</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>məzsənmi</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="int"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>r</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>rmi</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="int"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>məz</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>məzmi</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="int"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>rik</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>rikmi</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="int"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mərik</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mərikmi</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="int"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>rsiniz</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>rsinizmi</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="int"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>məzsiniz</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>məzsinizmi</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="int"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>rler</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>rlermi</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="int"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>məzlər</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>məzlərmi</l>
            <r>mək<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="int"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
      </pardef>

    <e lm="bəsləmək"><i>bəslə</i><par n="bəslə/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mənimsəmək"><i>mənimsə</i><par n="bəslə/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bənzəmək"><i>bənzə</i><par n="bəslə/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="toplamaq"><i>topla</i><par n="bəslə/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="qoşmaq"><i>qoş</i><par n="bəslə/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="inləmək"><i>inlə</i><par n="bəslə/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="istəmək"><i>istə</i><par n="bəslə/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="naxışlamaq"><i>naxışla</i><par n="bəslə/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="təqib etmək"><i>təqib<b/>et</i><par n="bəslə/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mələmək"><i>mələ</i><par n="bəslə/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ödəmək"><i>ödə</i><par n="bəslə/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="xülasə etmək"><i>xülasə<b/>et</i><par n="bəslə/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sərinləmək"><i>sərinlə</i><par n="bəslə/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="süsləmək"><i>süslə</i><par n="bəslə/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tərləmək"><i>tərlə</i><par n="bəslə/mək__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="yükləmək"><i>yüklə</i><par n="bəslə/mək__vblex"/></e>
